Mississippi, session 2026, HB4116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Charity Payne-Williams of Coahoma County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on June 23, 2003, in Tunica County for the crime of Embezzlement, for which she was sentenced to serve five (5) years within the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was released on June 23, 2008 due to expiration of sentence.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.